Washington statutes.
RCW 21.35.025

Registering a security in beneficiary form—Words of designation.

Registration in beneficiary form may be shown by the words "transfer on death" or the abbreviation "TOD," or by the words "pay on death" or the abbreviation "POD," after the name of the registered owner or owners and before the name of a beneficiary.

[ 1993 c 287 s 5.]